Colorado, session 2026A, HB1399.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-219, amend
(7)(c) introductory portion and (7)(c)(I) as follows:
24-75-219. Transfers - transportation - capital construction -
definitions.
(7) In addition to any other transfers required by this section:
(c) On each July 1 from July 1, 2024, through July 1, 2031 JULY 1,
2025, AND ON EACH JULY 1 BEGINNING JULY 1, 2029, THROUGH JULY 1,
2031, the state treasurer shall transfer:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(I) Ten million five hundred thousand dollars from the general fund
to the multimodal transportation and mitigation options fund. and
SECTION 2. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, to implement this
act, the cash funds appropriation from the multimodal transportation and
mitigation options fund created in 43-4-1103 (1)(a), C.R.S., made in the
annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the
department of transportation for multimodal transportation projects is
decreased by $10,500,000.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year if:
(a) The amount of the cash funds appropriation from the multimodal
transportation and mitigation options fund created in 43-4-1103 (1)(a),
C.R.S. made in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year to the department of transportation for multimodal transportation
projects is less than the amount of the adjustment required in subsection (1)
of this section; or
(b) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year does not include an appropriation to the department of transportation
for multimodal transportation projects.
SECTION 3. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that section 2 of this act takes effect only if the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year becomes law, in which
case section 2 takes effect upon the effective date of this act or of the annual
general appropriation act for state fiscal year 2026-27, whichever is later.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1399

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1399